Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2380.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2807.1. Energy storage procurement.(a) Energy storage program.--The commission shall require each electric distribution company to establish an energy storage program that is designed to achieve at least 3,000 3,500 total megawatts of capacity in the aggregate from front-of-the-meter energy storage systems by July 1, 2033 31, 2035 . The total megawatts of capacity shall consist of at least 2,000 megawatts of short-duration storage and , 1,000 megawatts of long-duration storage . AND 500 MEGAWATTS OF MULTIDAY STORAGE. <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516 (B) PERMITTED USES.--AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL UTILIZE THE DISTRIBUTION-CONNECTED AND TRANSMISSION-CONNECTED ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS PROCURED UNDER THIS SECTION TO PERFORM GRID SERVICES DURING PEAK OR OFF-PEAK DEMAND PERIODS, INCLUDING THE FOLLOWING:(1) PEAK DEMAND REDUCTION AND PEAK LOAD MANAGEMENT.(2) FREQUENCY REGULATION, VOLTAGE SUPPORT AND OTHER ANCILLARY SERVICES.(3) AVOIDING OR DEFERRING TRADITIONAL CAPITAL INVESTMENTS ON THE DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM.(4) BACKUP GENERATION SERVICES DURING OUTAGES OR OTHER ELECTRIC SERVICE DISRUPTIONS.(5) EXCEPT FOR DISTRIBUTION-CONNECTED STORAGE, PARTICIPATION IN THE WHOLESALE ENERGY, CAPACITY OR ANCILLARY MARKETS OF THE REGIONAL TRANSMISSION ORGANIZATION IN WHICH THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY PARTICIPATES.(6) ANY OTHER GRID SERVICES APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION TO BENEFIT RATEPAYERS AND IMPROVE THE RELIABILITY OF THE DISTRIBUTION OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM.(C) SYSTEM RELIABILITY ASSESSMENT.--(1) WITHIN 180 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL CONDUCT AND SUBMIT AN ASSESSMENT TO THE COMMISSION ON THE RELIABILITY OF THE DISTRIBUTION AND TRANSMISSION SYSTEM WITHIN THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY'S SERVICE TERRITORY.(2) THE COMMISSION'S CALCULATIONS AND ASSIGNMENT OF CAPACITY TARGETS UNDER SUBSECTION (D) SHALL BE BASED ON THE COMMISSION'S REVIEW AND FINDINGS FROM THE ASSESSMENT COMPLETED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, INCLUDING THE ASSIGNMENT OF 20260HB2380PN3630 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SPECIFIC TARGETS FOR DISTRIBUTION-CONNECTED AND TRANSMISSION-CONNECTED ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS BASED ON THE IDENTIFIED RELIABILITY NEEDS DESCRIBED IN THE ASSESSMENT.(3) THE ASSESSMENT SHALL IDENTIFY, AT MINIMUM, THE FOLLOWING:(I) SPECIFIC AREAS OF THE DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM AND TRANSMISSION SYSTEM WITH SYSTEM CONSTRAINTS AND CONGESTION POINTS.(II) THE RELIABILITY NEEDS OF THE TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM THAT MAY BE ADDRESSED BY THE PROCUREMENT OF ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS, INCLUDING SHORT-DURATION, LONG-DURATION AND MULTIDAY STORAGE.(III) AN ANALYSIS OF THE MEGAWATTS OR MEGAWATT-HOURS OF CAPACITY FROM ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS NEEDED TO SERVE AS A COST-EFFECTIVE ALTERNATIVE TO TRADITIONAL CAPITAL INVESTMENTS ON THE DISTRIBUTION AND TRANSMISSION SYSTEM.(IV) AN ANALYSIS TO DETERMINE THE TECHNICAL FEASIBILITY OF THE PROCUREMENT OF DISTRIBUTION-CONNECTED AND TRANSMISSION-CONNECTED ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS TO PROVIDE GRID SERVICES OR ADDRESS THE RELIABILITY NEEDS OF THE TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM.(V) AN ANALYSIS OF THE MOST PRACTICAL AND COST-EFFECTIVE APPLICATIONS OF SHORT-DURATION, LONG-DURATION AND MULTIDAY DURATION STORAGE ON THE DISTRIBUTION AND TRANSMISSION SYSTEM TO IMPROVE SYSTEM PERFORMANCE AND DELIVER COST SAVINGS TO RATEPAYERS.(VI) ANY OTHER INFORMATION OR SUPPORTING DATA REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSION TO PROPERLY CALCULATE THE APPORTIONED SHARE OF ENERGY STORAGE CAPACITY FOR EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY.20260HB2380PN3630 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) (D) Allocation of capacity targets.--Within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection, FOLLOWING THE SUBMISSION OF AN ASSESSMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C), the commission shall calculate and assign each electric distribution company's apportioned share of the 3,000 3,500 total megawatts of capacity for short-duration storage and , long-duration storage AND MULTIDAY STORAGE in a manner consistent with subsection (a). The commission's calculations shall be based on the service load and annual system peak demand of each applicable electric distribution company's service territory, in addition to any other criteria that the commission determines to be appropriate.(c) (E) Target modifications.-- (1) The commission may adjust or modify the apportioned share of energy storage system capacity under subsection (b) (D) for each electric distribution company if there is a demonstrated lack of commercially available energy storage systems or procurement proposals received, as determined by the commission.(2) If found by the commission to be in the public interest, the commission may establish a cap on the total megawatts of energy storage system capacity that may be procured or owned by an electric distribution company under this section.(3) The commission may, after an adequate period of implementation, increase the total megawatts of capacity required under subsection (a) and calculate new apportioned shares for each electric distribution company if the commission finds doing so to be in the public interest for efficient, reliable and affordable service.20260HB2380PN3630 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Competitive procurement.--Subject to approval by the commission, each electric distribution company shall use an open, fair and nondiscriminatory competitive procurement process, including the use of auctions or requests for proposals, to reach the company's apportioned share of the total megawatts of capacity as described under subsection (b).(4) THE COMMISSION MAY ADJUST THE PROCUREMENT SCHEDULE UNDER SUBSECTION (F) IF THERE IS A DEMONSTRATED LACK OF COMMERCIALLY AVAILABLE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS OR PROCUREMENT PROPOSALS RECEIVED, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION, OR ANY EXTERNAL DELAYS BEYOND CONTROL OF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY, INCLUDING ANY IMPACTS TO THE PROCUREMENT CYCLE ATTRIBUTABLE TO PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC.(F) COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT.--(1) SUBJECT TO APPROVAL BY THE COMMISSION, EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL USE AN OPEN, FAIR AND NONDISCRIMINATORY COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT PROCESS, INCLUDING THE USE OF AUCTIONS OR REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS, TO REACH THE COMPANY'S APPORTIONED SHARE OF THE TOTAL MEGAWATTS OF CAPACITY AS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (D).(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY'S PROPOSED COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT PROCESS AND SOLICIT FEEDBACK FROM STAKEHOLDERS FOR ANY POTENTIAL ADJUSTMENTS PRIOR TO EACH PROCUREMENT.(3) UNDER THE COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT PROCESS, EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL ISSUE A SOLICITATION FOR ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM PROJECTS AND OPEN BIDDING TO INDEPENDENT POWER PRODUCERS IN ORDER TO REACH THE TOTAL MEGAWATTS OF CAPACITY REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(4) EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL PROCURE A 20260HB2380PN3630 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MINIMUM OF 100 MEGAWATTS FOR EACH PROCUREMENT, REGARDLESS OF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY'S APPORTIONED SHARE OF CAPACITY DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.(e) (G) Use of independent monitor.--The commission shall appoint an independent evaluator to monitor and report on each competitive procurement process under subsection (d) (F) . An independent evaluator shall have access to all information and data relating to the competitive procurement process, provided that all proprietary information shall remain confidential. For the purposes of ensuring an open, fair and transparent solicitation and bid selection process, the independent evaluator appointed by the commission shall have the following duties:(1) Monitor the competitive procurement process to identify any noncompliance with the requirements under this section.(2) Issue a report to the commission that analyzes the procedures, methods of solicitation and timeline of each competitive procurement process, including any recommendations to improve the process.(3) For each proposed contract of a winning bid proposal, issue a report to the commission that analyzes the solicitation and bid selection process, including an assessment of whether all bids were evaluated in a fair and nondiscriminatory manner.(f) (H) Schedule.--Each electric distribution company shall enter into cost-effective long-term purchase contracts OF AT LEAST 15 YEARS for the company's apportioned share of the 3,000 3,500 total megawatts of capacity under subsection (a) in accordance with the following schedule:20260HB2380PN3630 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) By July 31, 2028 2029 , at least 500 megawatts of transmission-connected short-duration storage and , 100 megawatts of distribution-connected short-duration storage AND 100 MEGAWATTS OF TRANSMISSION-CONNECTED LONG-DURATION STORAGE shall be procured, including existing energy storage systems.(2) By July 31, 2029 2031 , at least AN ADDITIONAL 500 megawatts of transmission-connected short-duration storage , 200 MEGAWATTS OF TRANSMISSION-CONNECTED LONG-DURATION STORAGE AND 100 MEGAWATTS OF MULTIDAY STORAGE shall be procured. (3) By July 1, 2030, at least 500 31, 2033, AT LEAST AN ADDITIONAL 500 megawatts of transmission-connected short- duration storage , 300 MEGAWATTS OF TRANSMISSION-CONNECTED LONG-DURATION STORAGE AND 200 MEGAWATTS OF MULTIDAY STORAGE shall be procured.(4) By July 31, 2033 2035 , all remaining energy storage systems capacity shall be procured, including AT LEAST 400 total megawatts OF DISTRIBUTION-CONNECTED short-duration storage and 1,000 megawatts of long- duration storage. , 400 MEGAWATTS OF TRANSMISSION-CONNECTED LONG-DURATION STORAGE AND 200 MEGAWATTS OF MULTIDAY STORAGE.(g) (I) Procurement standards.--For the purposes of subsection (d) (F) , each electric distribution company shall comply with the following competitive procurement requirements:(1) FOR EACH COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT PROCESS, EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL ESTABLISH AN OPEN AND TRANSPARENT STAKEHOLDER PROCESS WITH THE COMMISSION, PROSPECTIVE BIDDERS AND STAKEHOLDERS TO REVIEW THE PROPOSED TERMS, PROCEDURES, REQUIREMENTS AND OTHER INFORMATION RELATED TO THE COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT PROCESS.20260HB2380PN3630 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) (2) For each competitive procurement process, each electric distribution company shall provide an initial description of the following information to prospective bidders:(i) The reliability needs of the distribution or transmission system that may be addressed in a cost-effective manner by energy storage system capacity, including the reduction of system constraints, the deferral or replacement of transmission or distribution upgrades and reduction in system congestion during peak demand periods in specific areas of the distribution system.(ii) The size, resource type and minimum thresholds required.(iii) The qualifications and experience required for submitting bids under the competitive procurement process.(iv) The preferred location of the energy storage system.(v) Detailed instructions for preparing bids and the estimated timeline for bid evaluation.(vi) The criteria for selecting and awarding contracts to qualified bidders.(vii) Any other information deemed necessary by the commission.(2) (3) Each electric distribution company shall select and award the lowest responsible bidder BIDDERS THAT REPRESENT THE BEST VALUE under a competitive procurement process based on evaluating, but not limited to, the following criteria:20260HB2380PN3630 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The cost-effectiveness to ratepayers over the course of the term of the contract after taking into consideration the benefits to the distribution and transmission system.(ii) The ability to meet the reliability needs of the distribution or transmission system identified by the electric distribution company under paragraph (1).(iii) The ability to guarantee firm capacity performance for the entire duration of the contract terms.(iv) The adequate demonstration of project viability within a commercially reasonable time frame, if applicable.(v) The project developer's qualifications and experience.(vi) The proximity to the distribution or transmission system experiencing constraints or congestion.(vii) Benefits to the businesses and workforce of the Commonwealth.(3) Each (4) IF THE COST-EFFECTIVENESS AND VALUE OF SERVICES ARE COMPARABLE TO OTHER QUALIFIED BIDDERS, EACH electric distribution company shall prioritize the evaluation of GIVE PRIORITY TO a qualified bidder that demonstrates any of the following:(i) For construction, expansion, rehabilitation, renovation or site work performed on energy storage system, all contractors and subcontractors comply with fair wage standards, including compliance with the provisions of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, 20260HB2380PN3630 - 9 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.(ii) The supply chain of equipment, components and materials relating to the energy storage system is sourced within the United States.(iii) A third-party developer has made investments in the manufacturing or assembly workforce of the energy storage system that is located within this Commonwealth.(h) Decommissioning.--Each contract agreement entered into under this section shall include provisions requiring the owner or operator to provide a decommissioning plan for the procured energy storage systems, including the recycling or reuse of all qualifying components of each system.(J) DECOMMISSIONING AND SAFETY.--EACH CONTRACT AGREEMENT ENTERED INTO UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE PROVISIONS REQUIRING THE OWNER OR OPERATOR TO:(1) PROVIDE A DECOMMISSIONING PLAN FOR THE PROCURED ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS, INCLUDING THE RECYCLING OR REUSE OF ALL QUALIFYING COMPONENTS OF EACH SYSTEM TO THE EXTENT THAT THE RECYCLING AND REUSE CAN BE REASONABLY ACHIEVED BY EXISTING COMMERCIAL PRACTICES.(2) COMPLY WITH THE NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION 855 STANDARD IN EFFECT ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION FOR THE INSTALLATION OF STATIONARY ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS, IF APPLICABLE, TO THE CHEMISTRY OF THE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM.(K) CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.--A THIRD-PARTY DEVELOPER THAT PARTICIPATES IN A COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT PROCESS TO ENTER INTO A CONTRACT WITH AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL NOT DISCLOSE, DISTRIBUTE OR OTHERWISE MAKE AVAILABLE ANY INFORMATION RELATING TO THE OPERATIONS OF THE ELECTRIC GRID WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION 20260HB2380PN3630 - 10 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COMPANY. A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ENFORCEMENT BY THE COMMISSION UNDER CHAPTER 33 (RELATING TO VIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES).(i) (L) Ownership.--The energy storage systems procured under the program shall be owned by a combination of the electric distribution company and third-party developers. The following apply: (1) An electric distribution company may enter into bilateral agreements under a competitive procurement process to construct, own and operate distribution-connected energy storage systems to reach part of the company's apportioned share of the 3,000 total megawatts of capacity under subsection (b).(2) An electric distribution company may not acquire ownership of more than 50% of the distribution-connected energy storage systems that are procured under this section.(3) An electric distribution company may not acquire ownership of any transmission-connected energy storage systems that are required to be procured under this section.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a third-party developer from originating, securing site control, developing, constructing, owning, operating or transferring ownership of a distribution-connected energy storage system to an electric distribution company. THIRD- PARTY DEVELOPERS. AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY MAY NOT OWN THE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS CONSTRUCTED OR PROCURED TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.(j) (M) Commission approval.--The commission, in consultation with the independent evaluator under subsection (e) (G) , shall establish procedures to review all proposed contracts 20260HB2380PN3630 - 11 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prior to the execution of the contract with the lowest responsible WINNING bidder. The following apply: (1) An electric distribution company shall file a proposed contract with the commission and provide sufficient documentation to permit the commission to conduct the review required under paragraph (3), including the cost-benefit analysis used to determine the cost-effectiveness of the procurement and methods used to select a qualified bidder.(2) The commission shall review each proposed contract to determine the following:(i) The cost-effectiveness of the contract terms and impact on ratepayer affordability . , INCLUDING CONSIDERATION OF THE FOLLOWING:(A) AVOIDED OR DEFERRED TRANSMISSION, DISTRIBUTION, GENERATION AND OTHER TRADITIONAL INFRASTRUCTURE UPGRADE COSTS, INCLUDING THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM FUNCTIONS AS A NONWIRES ALTERNATIVE.(B) SYSTEM EFFICIENCY AND OPERATIONAL BENEFITS, INCLUDING CONGESTION REDUCTION, PEAK LOAD REDUCTION, REDUCTION OF MARGINAL LINE LOSSES, PROVISION OF VOLTAGE SUPPORT AND REACTIVE POWER SERVICES, MITIGATION OF LOCALIZED SYSTEM CONSTRAINTS AND INCREASED DISTRIBUTED ENERGY RESOURCE HOSTING CAPACITY.(C) RELIABILITY AND RESILIENCY BENEFITS, INCLUDING ENHANCEMENT OF SYSTEM RELIABILITY IN CONSTRAINED OR HIGH-RISK AREAS AND BENEFITS TO DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS.(D) MARKET AND RATEPAYER SAVINGS, INCLUDING 20260HB2380PN3630 - 12 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REDUCTION IN THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY'S OBLIGATION TO PROCURE CAPACITY IN PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC, THROUGH MEASURABLE REDUCTIONS IN PEAK LOAD CONTRIBUTION THAT RESULT IN REDUCED INSTALLED CAPACITY OBLIGATIONS CONSISTENT WITH THE MARKET RULES OF PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC.(E) THE AVAILABILITY AND UTILIZATION OF APPLICABLE FEDERAL OR STATE TAX CREDITS OR EXEMPTIONS.(ii) Whether the projected benefits to the distribution and transmission system exceed the costs of the proposed contract terms.(iii) Whether the electric distribution company has made all reasonable efforts to design the procurement contract to protect ratepayers from stranded assets, energy storage system degradation risks, supply chain volatility and other unforeseen circumstances that may increase costs over time or delay project development.(iv) Whether the electric distribution company has complied with the requirements under this section.(3) The commission may not approve the proposed contract under this section unless the commission finds that:(i) the procurement of the energy storage system is in the public interest;(ii) the proposed contract is a cost-effective mechanism to reliably procure energy storage system capacity to benefit the distribution system or transmission system, or both; and (iii) the bid selection and solicitation process are found to be fair, objective and nondiscriminatory by the 20260HB2380PN3630 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 independent evaluator . ; AND (IV) THE PROCUREMENT OF THE ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM DEMONSTRATES THE ABILITY TO PROVIDE MEASURABLE RELIABILITY, RESILIENCY OR PEAK DEMAND REDUCTION BENEFITS TO THE DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM.(4) Within 45 days of submission, the commission shall approve or reject a proposed contract. If the commission rejects a proposed contract, the commission may, as a condition of approval, require an electric distribution company to modify the proposed contract terms to address any deficiencies identified by the commission or independent evaluator. An electric distribution company shall have 60 days to file a modified proposed contract with the commission. The modified proposal shall be approved or rejected by the commission within 30 days.(k) (N) Annual report.-- (1) Each electric distribution company shall submit an annual report to the commission relating to the progress and results of the energy storage program within each electric distribution service territory. The report shall include the following:(i) Documentation of the expenditures for all procurement contracts entered into with a third-party developer.(ii) Measurement and verification of each energy storage system's performance to improve the reliability of distribution system and provide peak demand management, if applicable at the time of submission.(iii) The location and ownership status each energy storage system procured.20260HB2380PN3630 - 14 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) (III) Evaluation of the cost-effectiveness of program expenditures.(v) (IV) Any other information required by the commission.(2) Beginning five years after the effective date of this paragraph and annually thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the CONSUMER PROTECTION AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE, THE CONSUMER PROTECTION, TECHNOLOGY AND UTILITIES COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE Environmental Resources and Energy Committee of the Senate and the Energy Committee of the House of Representatives.(l) Cost recovery.--An electric distribution company may recover on a full and current basis from customers, through a reconcilable adjustment clause under section 1307 (relating to sliding scale of rates; adjustments), all reasonable and prudent costs in the procurement of a transmission-connected energy storage system under a competitive procurement process under this section, as determined by the commission. Any decreased revenues of an electric distribution company due to changes in energy demand or avoided infrastructure costs shall not be a recoverable cost under a reconcilable automatic adjustment clause. Subject to commission approval, an electric distribution company's ownership of a distribution-connected energy storage system under an executed bilateral agreement may be included in the rate base of the public utility and recovered in accordance with section 1308(d) (relating to voluntary changes in rates).(m) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to an electric distribution company with fewer than 600,000 customers.(O) COST RECOVERY.--20260HB2380PN3630 - 15 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY MAY RECOVER ON A FULL AND CURRENT BASIS FROM CUSTOMERS, THROUGH A RECONCILABLE ADJUSTMENT CLAUSE UNDER SECTION 1307 (RELATING TO SLIDING SCALE OF RATES; ADJUSTMENTS), ALL REASONABLE AND PRUDENT COSTS IN THE PROCUREMENT OF ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS UNDER A COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT PROCESS UNDER THIS SECTION, AS APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION.(2) ANY DECREASED REVENUES OF AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY DUE TO CHANGES IN ENERGY DEMAND OR AVOIDED INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS SHALL NOT BE A RECOVERABLE COST UNDER A RECONCILABLE AUTOMATIC ADJUSTMENT CLAUSE.(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE RULES OR REGULATIONS TO ENSURE THAT ALL AVOIDED INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS AND REVENUES GENERATED THROUGH PARTICIPATION IN WHOLESALE MARKETS ARE CREDITED IN FULL AGAINST THE RECOVERABLE COSTS UNDER A RECONCILABLE ADJUSTMENT CLAUSE. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, EACH ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY SHALL ESTABLISH A METHODOLOGY FOR CALCULATING THE AVOIDED INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS OF THE DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM AND TRANSMISSION SYSTEM ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE SERVICES OF THE PROCURED ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS.(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A COST ALLOCATION METHODOLOGY TO ENSURE THAT:(I) ALL RECOVERABLE COSTS ARE FINANCED BY THE SAME CUSTOMER CLASS THAT WILL RECEIVE DIRECT BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE PROCUREMENT OF ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS.(II) THE DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM BENEFITS ATTRIBUTABLE TO EACH CUSTOMER CLASS ARE REFLECTED.(III) THE ALLOCATION OF COSTS ACCOUNT FOR ALL 20260HB2380PN3630 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EXISTING SURCHARGES AND COMMISSION-APPROVED TARIFFS APPLICABLE TO THE PEAK DEMANDS OF LARGE INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIAL CUSTOMERS.(P) APPLICABILITY.--THIS SECTION SHALL NOT APPLY TO:(1) AN ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION COMPANY WITH FEWER THAN 500,000 CUSTOMERS.(2) ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS WITH LESS THAN 50 KILOWATTS OF CAPACITY.(Q) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO CONFLICT OR SUPERSEDE THE JURISDICTION OF THE FEDERAL ENERGY REGULATORY COMMISSION OR THE RULES OR TARIFFS OF THE INDEPENDENT SYSTEM OPERATOR OR ITS FUNCTIONAL EQUIVALENT.(n) (R) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Energy storage system." An integrated set of technologies connected to the distribution system or transmission system that can absorb electrical energy, store the energy for a period of time and deliver the energy for use at a later time. The term includes all types of electric storage technologies, regardless of their size, storage medium or operational purpose, including:(1) thermal storage;(2) electrochemical storage;(3) thermo-mechanical storage; and(4) hydrogen-based storage."FRONT-OF-THE-METER ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM." AN ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM INTERCONNECTED TO THE DISTRIBUTION OR TRANSMISSION SYSTEM AND CAPABLE OF PARTICIPATING IN THE WHOLESALE MARKET OR DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM GRID SERVICES."Long-duration storage." An energy storage system that is 20260HB2380PN3630 - 17 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 capable of dispatching energy at the system's full rated nameplate capacity for a period of 10 hours or more."MULTIDAY STORAGE." AN ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM THAT IS CAPABLE OF DISPATCHING ENERGY AT ITS FULL RATED NAMEPLATE CAPACITY FOR A PERIOD OF 24 HOURS OR MORE."Short-duration storage." An energy storage system that is capable of dispatching energy at the system's full rated nameplate capacity for a period greater than two hours but less than 10 hours.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2380PN3630 - 18 - <--12345678910